North Carolina, session 2025, HB843.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. The Department of Natural and Cultural Resources (Department) shall
negotiate and enter into a Memorandum of Agreement (MOA) with the Town of Lake
Waccamaw providing for access to the Waccamaw Dam (Dam) located within Lake Waccamaw
State Park to perform repairs. The MOA shall provide, at a minimum, for all of the following:
(1) Access to the State Park by employees, agents, and contractors of the Town
for the purpose of planning and undertaking necessary repairs to the Dam.
(2) The scope, nature, and estimated time line of the Dam repairs.
(3) The resumption of maintenance and management of the Dam by the
Department following the completion of the Dam repairs.
SECTION 2. The Department of Natural and Cultural Resources shall enter into the
Memorandum of Agreement required by Section 1 of this act no later than September 1, 2025,
and shall submit a copy of the Memorandum of Agreement to the Joint Legislative Oversight
Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources and the Fiscal Research
Division prior to the convening of the 2026 Regular Session of the 2025 General Assembly.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H843-v-1*